el: Στυλ καλωδίου: Πλεκτό; Σπειροειδές; Επίπεδη; Φωτισμένο; Σύνδεσμοι αριστερής γωνίας; Μαγνητικό αποσπώμενο; RGB; Πτυσσόμενο; Σύνδεσμοι δεξιάς γωνίας; Τυπικό στρογγυλό; Άλλο
da: Kabelstil: Flettet; Oprullet; Flad; Oplyst; Venstre-vinklede stik; Magnetisk aftagelig; RGB; Udtrækkelig; Højre-vinklede stik; Standard rund; Andet
ja: ケーブルスタイル: 編み込み; コイル状; フラット; イルミネーション付き; 左角度コネクタ; 磁気着脱式; RGB; 格納式; 直角コネクタ; 標準ラウンド; その他
hu: Kábel stílusa: Sodrott; Tekercselt; Lapos; Megvilágított; Bal oldali szögű csatlakozók; Mágneses leválasztható; RGB; Visszahúzható; Jobb oldali szögű csatlakozók; Standard kerek; Egyéb
de: Kabelstil: Geflochten; Gewickelt; Flach; Beleuchtet; Linksgewinkelte Stecker; Magnetisch abnehmbar; RGB; Einziehbar; Rechtwinklige Stecker; Standard rund; Sonstiges
th: รูปแบบสายเคเบิล: ถัก; ขด; ราบ; มีแสงส่องสว่าง; หัวต่องอซ้าย; แม่เหล็กถอดได้; RGB; แบบพับเก็บได้; หัวต่องอขวา; กลมมาตรฐาน; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Stil kabela: Pleteni; Spiralno; Ravna; Osvijetljena; Konektori s lijevim kutom; Magnetski odvojivi; RGB; Na uvlačenje; Konektori s desnim kutom; Standardni okrugli; Ostalo
pt-BR: Estilo do cabo: Trançado; Enrolado; Plana; Iluminado; Conectores com ângulo à esquerda; Magnético destacável; RGB; Retrátil; Conectores com ângulo à direita; Redondo padrão; Outro
lt-LT: Kabelio stilius: Pinti; Susuktas; Plokščia; Apšviestas; Kairės kampiniai jungtys; Magnetinis atskiriamas; RGB; Ištraukiamas; Dešinės kampiniai jungtys; Standartinis apvalus; Kita
ro-RO: Stil cablu: Împletit; Înfășurat; Plată; Iluminat; Cu conectori în unghi stâng; Magnetic detașabil; RGB; Retractabil; Cu conectori în unghi drept; Rotund standard; Altele
it: Stile del cavo: Intrecciato; A spirale; Piatto; Illuminato; Connettori ad angolo sinistro; Magnetico staccabile; RGB; Retrattile; Connettori ad angolo destro; Rotondo standard; Altro
fi: Kaapelin tyyli: Punottu; Kierretty; Tasainen; Valaistu; Vasemmanpuoleiset kulmaliittimet; Magneettinen irrotettava; RGB; Sisäänvedettävä; Oikeanpuoleiset kulmaliittimet; Vakiopaksu pyöreä; Muu
es: Estilo del cable: Trenzado; En espiral; Puro; Iluminado; Conectores en ángulo izquierdo; Magnético desmontable; RGB; Retráctil; Conectores en ángulo recto; Redondo estándar; Otros
zh-TW: 纜線樣式: 編織; 盤繞; 平坦; 照明; 左角度接頭; 磁吸可拆式; RGB; 可伸縮; 直角接頭; 標準圓形; 其他
bg-BG: Стил на кабела: Плетен; Навит; Плосък; Осветен; Конектори под ляв ъгъл; Магнитно отделящ се; RGB; Прибиращ се; Конектори под десен ъгъл; Стандартен кръгъл; Други
pt-PT: Estilo do cabo: Entrançado; Enrolado; Plano; Iluminado; Conectores com ângulo à esquerda; Magnético destacável; RGB; Retrátil; Conectores com ângulo à direita; Redondo padrão; Outro
nb: Kabelstil: Flettet; Kveilet; Flat; Opplyst; Venstrevinklede kontakter; Magnetisk avtakbar; RGB; Uttrekkbar; Høyrevinklede kontakter; Standard rund; Annet
sl-SI: Slog kabla: Pletena; Spiralni; Ploščata; Osvetljena; Levi kotni priključki; Magnetni snemljiv; RGB; Izvlečno; Desni kotni priključki; Standardni okrogel; Drugo
cs: Styl kabelu: Splétaný; Spirálový; Plochý; Osvětlený; Levé úhlové konektory; Magnetický odpojitelný; RGB; Zatahovací; Pravé úhlové konektory; Standardní kulatý; Jiné
sv: Kabelstil: Flätad; Ringad; Platt; Upplyst; Vänstervinklade kontakter; Magnetisk löstagbar; RGB; Hopfällbart; Högervinklade kontakter; Standard rund; Övrigt
fr: Style de câble: Tressé; Enroulé; Plate; Illuminé; Connecteurs coudés à gauche; Magnétique détachable; RVB; Rétractable; Connecteurs coudés à droite; Rond standard; Autre
vi: Kiểu cáp: Bện; Xoắn lò xo; Phẳng; Có đèn; Đầu nối góc trái; Từ tính có thể tháo rời; RGB; Có thể cuộn gọn; Đầu nối góc phải; Tròn tiêu chuẩn; Khác
tr: Kablo stili: Örgülü; Sarılmış; Düz; Işıklı; Sol açılı konnektörler; Manyetik çıkarılabilir; RGB; Geri çekilebilir; Sağ açılı konnektörler; Standart yuvarlak; Diğer
pl: Styl przewodu: Pleciony; Zwijany; Płaski; Oświetlone; Złącza kątowe lewe; Magnetyczny odłączany; RGB; Rozwijany; Złącza kątowe prawe; Standardowy okrągły; Inne
ko: 케이블 스타일: 브레이드; 코일; 플랫; 조명; 왼쪽 각도 커넥터; 자석 분리형; RGB; 개폐식; 오른쪽 각도 커넥터; 표준 원형; 기타
en: Cable style: Braided; Coiled; Flat; Illuminated; Left-angle connectors; Magnetic detachable; RGB; Retractable; Right-angle connectors; Standard round; Other
zh-CN: 电缆样式: 编织; 螺旋卷曲型; 扁平的; 发光; 左弯角接头; 磁吸可拆卸; RGB; 可伸缩线; 直角接头; 标准圆形; 其他
nl: Kabelstijl: Gevlochten; Opgerold; Vlak; Verlicht; Linkse hoekconnectoren; Magnetisch afneembaar; RGB; Uitschuifbaar; Rechtse hoekconnectoren; Standaard rond; Andere
sk-SK: Štýl kábla: Pletený; Špirálový; Rovný; Osvetlený; Ľavouhlé konektory; Magnetický odpojiteľný; RGB; Sklopný; Pravouhlé konektory; Štandardný okrúhly; Iné
ru: Стиль кабеля: Плетеный; Спиральный; Плоский; С подсветкой; С левоугольными разъемами; Магнитный съемный; RGB; Втягивающийся; С прямоугольными разъемами; Стандартный круглый; Другой